Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-506
Violations; penalty; enforcement.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 71-501 to 71-505, 71-507 to 71-513, or 71-514.01 to 71-514.05 or section 71-531 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each offense, except that any person who willfully or maliciously discloses, except as provided by law, the content of any reports, notifications, or resulting investigations made under section 71-502 and subject to the confidentiality provisions of section 71-503.01 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. The Attorney General or the county attorney may, in accordance with the laws of the state governing injunctions and other process, maintain an action in the name of the state against any person or any private or public entity for violating sections 71-501 to 71-505, 71-507 to 71-513, or 71-514.01 to 71-514.05 or section 71-531 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such sections.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. VIII, § 6, p. 781;

C.S.1922, § 8227;

C.S.1929, § 71-2306;

R.S.1943, § 71-506;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 151;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 11;

Laws 1989, LB 157, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 4.